Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.565

Reorganization as subsidiary of bank holding company—Valuation of shares of dissenting shareholders.

The value of the shares of a dissenting shareholder who has properly perfected dissenter's rights shall be ascertained as of the day prior to the date of the shareholder action approving such reorganization by three appraisers, one to be selected by the owners of two-thirds of the dissenting shares, one by the board of directors of the acquiring bank holding company, and the third by the two so chosen. The valuation agreed upon by any two appraisers shall govern. The dissenting shareholders shall bear, on a pro rata basis based on the number of dissenting shares owned, the cost of their appraisal and one-half of the cost of the third appraisal, and the acquiring bank holding company shall bear the cost of its appraisal and one-half of the cost of the third appraisal. If the appraisal is not completed within ninety days after the effective date of the reorganization, the director shall cause an appraisal to be made which shall be final and binding upon all parties. The cost of such appraisal shall be borne equally by the dissenting shareholders and the acquiring bank holding company. The dissenting shareholders shall share their half of the cost on a pro rata basis based on the number of dissenting shares owned.

[ 1994 c 256 s 39; 1994 c 92 s 38; 1982 c 196 s 4. Formerly RCW 30.04.565.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1994 c 92 s 38 and by 1994 c 256 s 39, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.

Severability—1982 c 196: See note following RCW 30A.04.550.